Utah statutes.
31A-5-404.   Communications to shareholders, policyholders, and voting
members -- Commissioner's attendance at meetings.
(1) (a)  Sections 16-10a-1601 through 16-10a-1604 apply to the books and
records and their inspection by shareholders of stock corporations.  Section
16-6a-1602 applies to the books and records and inspection rights of
policyholders or voting members of mutuals. However, the inspection of the
records of the names and addresses of policyholders or voting members of
mutuals is permitted only to communicate with other policyholders or voting
members regarding the nomination and election of candidates for the board, or
for other corporate matters which may be submitted to a vote of the
policyholders or voting members.  No person may, directly or indirectly, use
any information obtained in an inspection for any other purpose.
(b)  Any books, records, or minutes may be in written form or in any other
form capable of being converted into written form within a reasonable time.
(c)  Any provision of this chapter or of any articles or bylaws of a mutual,
which requires keeping a record of the names and addresses of policyholders
entitled to vote or voting members, is complied with by keeping a record of
the names of policyholders or voting members and the names and addresses of
insureds or persons paying premiums.  This provision requires mailing or
sending of notices, reports, proposals, ballots, or other materials to
policyholders or voting members of record.
(2)  Subject to Subsection (4), the commissioner may by rule prescribe that
copies of specified classes of communications circulated generally by a
corporation to shareholders, policyholders, or voting members be communicated
to the commissioner at the same time.
(3)  Subject to Subsection (4), the commissioner may attend any shareholders',
policyholders', or voting members' meeting as an observer.
(4)  Subsection (3) and, so far as it relates to communications to
shareholders, Subsection (2) do not apply to stock corporations whose voting
shares are owned by a single person, or whose shareholders are either members
of the board or are explicitly represented on it.
